Washington statutes.
RCW 35.13.176

Territory subject to annexation proposal—When annexation by another city or incorporation allowed.

After a petition proposing an annexation by a city or town is filed with the city or town or the governing body of the city or town, or after a resolution proposing an annexation by a city or town has been adopted by the city or town governing body, no territory included in the proposed annexation may be annexed by another city or town or incorporated into a city or town unless: (1) The boundary review board modifies the boundaries of the proposed annexation and removes the territory; (2) the boundary review board or review board created under RCW 35.13.171 rejects the proposed annexation; or (3) the city or town governing body rejects the proposed annexation or voters defeat the ballot proposition authorizing the annexation.

[ 1994 c 216 s 7.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1994 c 216: See note following RCW 35.02.015.